Nevada, session 83, SB176.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11.3. 1. The boards of trustees of the Clark County
School District, the Elko County School District, the Lyon County
School District and the White Pine County School District shall, in
coordination with the State Board of Nursing, establish and carry
out a pilot program during the 2026-2027 and 2027-2028 school
years to cover the costs of registering for examinations to obtain an
industry-recognized credential for pupils enrolled in a program of
career and technical education with a course of study designed to
allow the pupil to obtain an industry-recognized credential as a
certified nursing assistant.
-
*SB176_R1*

– 3 –
2. Pursuant to a pilot program established pursuant this section,
the Clark County School District, Elko County School District,
Lyon County School District and White Pine County School
District, as applicable, shall cover the cost for a pupil enrolled in the
school district to register for an examination to obtain an industry-
recognized credential, in an amount not to exceed $300 per pupil, if
the pupil:
(a) Is enrolled in a program of career and technical education
with a course of study designed to allow the pupil to obtain an
industry-recognized credential as a certified nursing assistant and
completes the final course of instruction for that particular course of
study;
(b) Elects to participate in the pilot program by opting to take an
examination to obtain an industry-recognized credential as a
certified nursing assistant in lieu of taking an end-of-program
assessment prescribed by the Department of Education for the
course of study;
(c) Satisfies all prerequisites to take the examination to obtain an
industry-recognized credential as a certified nursing assistant that
are established by the entity administering the examination; and
(d) Registers for and completes the examination to obtain an
industry-recognized credential as a certified nursing assistant.
3. A pupil who elects to participate in the pilot program
established pursuant to this section by opting to take an examination
to obtain an industry-recognized credential as a certified nursing
assistant in lieu of taking an end-of-program assessment prescribed
by the Department for the course of study and who obtains such an
industry-recognized credential must not be required to take an end-
of-program assessment prescribed by the Department in order to
obtain a certificate indicating completion of the program of career
and technical education.
4. The Clark County School District, Elko County School
District, Lyon County School District and White Pine County
School District shall coordinate with the State Board of Nursing and
any other relevant licensing or certification entity to:
(a) Establish a process for allocating and distributing funding
pursuant to subsection 2;
(b) Facilitate the scheduling and administration of examinations
described in subsection 2 at testing sites approved by the State
Board of Nursing;
(c) Inform pupils concerning eligibility to participate in the pilot
program established pursuant to this section;
(d) Monitor the implementation and effectiveness of the pilot
program established pursuant to this section to ensure equitable
-
*SB176_R1*

– 4 –
access to opportunities to obtain an industry-recognized credential
as a certified nursing assistant through the pilot program; and
(e) Track and compile information concerning the number of
pupils who:
(1) Elect to participate in the pilot program by opting to take
an examination to obtain an industry-recognized credential as a
certified nursing assistant in lieu of taking an end-of-program
assessment prescribed by the Department for the course of study;
and
(2) Obtain such an industry-recognized credential through
participation in the pilot program.
Sec. 11.7. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $148,800
for the purpose of making distributions to the Clark County School
District, Elko County School District, Lyon County School District
and White Pine County School District to enable those school
districts to carry out the provisions of section 11.3 of this act. The
Department shall distribute the money appropriated pursuant to this
subsection as follows:
(a) To the Clark County School District, $60,000 for the 2026-
2027 school year and $60,000 for the 2027-2028 school year.
(b) To the Elko County School District, $3,000 for the 2026-
2027 school year and $3,000 for the 2027-2028 school year.
(c) To the Lyon County School District, $9,000 for the 2026-
2027 school year and $9,000 for the 2027-2028 school year.
(d) To the White Pine County School District, $2,400 for the
2026-2027 school year and $2,400 for the 2027-2028 school year.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2028, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 22, 2028, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 22, 2028.
Sec. 12. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 13. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 14. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 15. 1. This section becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
2. Sections 1 to 14, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) On July 1, 2025, for the purpose of adopting any regulations
and performing any other preparatory administrative tasks that are
necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
-
*SB176_R1*

– 5 –
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB176_R1*